California statutes. Education Code
 schools shall provide for the academic education of adult inmates of state institutions or facilities under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections except in accordance with this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1260.

The county superintendent of schools, with the approval of the county board of education, may:

(a) Conduct studies through research and investigation as are determined by the county board to be required in connection with the future management, conditions, needs, and financial support of the schools within the county; or join with one or more school district or community college district governing boards in the conduct of the studies.

(b) Install and maintain exhibits of educational programs and activities of the school districts
 and community college districts within the county at any county fair or at any agricultural district fair.

(c) Inform and make known to the citizens of the county, the educational programs and activities of the school districts or community college districts in the territory within his or her jurisdiction.

(d) Subscribe for membership in any society, association, or organization which has for its purpose the promotion and advancement of public or private education, subject to the same restrictions as are imposed by Section 35173 on governing boards of school districts respecting those subscriptions.

(e) Provide in-service programs and coordinative services for any school or community college district governing board or governing board association in the territory under the jurisdiction of the county superintendent of
 schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

1262.

Each county superintendent of schools is authorized upon request to provide consultative or coordinative services for school districts and community college districts in the territory under his or her jurisdiction which have established educational programs that are designed to meet the requirements of federal law for the receipt of federal funds for the support of the programs, and that are supported in whole or in part by federal funds. The services may be financed by the federal funds as may be provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

1263.

It is the intent of the Legislature that certificated personnel serving in the public schools have a responsible understanding of the nature and range of physical, mental, and emotional disabilities of children and youth and of the major implications of such disabilities. In furtherance of this intent, county superintendents of schools are encouraged, in cooperation with school districts, community college districts and colleges and universities, to sponsor workshops or similar activities for certificated personnel to provide opportunities to gain or increase these understandings.

It is not the intent of the Legislature that this
 section be interpreted as a requirement for the issuance or the renewal of any credential.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1266.

Whenever the county superintendent of schools of any county provides for the maintenance and repair of the property of any school districts under his or her jurisdiction that elect to take advantage of the provisions of Sections 1267 to 1270, inclusive, he or she shall, upon the request of the governing board of that district, transfer from the general fund of the district to the “school maintenance and repair fund” a sum not to
 exceed 1 percent of the amount apportioned from the State School Fund to the district during the fiscal year in which the governing board of the district notifies him or her of its election to take advantage of the provisions of Sections 1267 to 1270, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 89, Sec. 1.   (AB 2081)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1267.

Out of the school maintenance and repair fund the superintendent of schools of the county shall purchase materials, bill the district on supplies and equipment, and employ labor to maintain and repair school premises and property of the school districts, under his or her jurisdiction which have elected to take advantage of the provisions of this article, and shall deliver a memorandum in triplicate of the cost of the service on or about the first of each calendar month to the school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 471, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1268.

Upon receipt of the memorandum the governing board of the district shall draw an order on the funds of the district in favor of the county superintendent of schools in the amount of such cost and forward it with the duplicate and triplicate of the memorandum to the superintendent of schools who shall verify the cost and file the duplicate with the county auditor and the triplicate with the county treasurer. In lieu of the issuance of an order by the governing board of the district in payment of the supplies and equipment, the superintendent of schools of the county may transfer from the proper account of the school district to his or her school maintenance
 and repair fund a sum equal to the cost of the services as stated in the memorandum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 471, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

1269.

The superintendent of schools of the county may employ such extra help as is necessary to perform the labor for the maintenance and repair work, as well as to provide for the supervision and transportation of the labor together with the equipment and materials for the work. The cost price of the maintenance and repair services to any school district is the original cost thereof and in addition a sum sufficient to reimburse the county superintendent of schools for all supervision, transportation, equipment, and other expenses, but the sum added shall not in any case exceed 10 percent of the cost of labor and supplies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 471, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

1270.

The county superintendent of schools of any county may use schoolbuses to transport pupils attending schools or classes operated by the county superintendent pursuant to Article 15 (commencing with Section 1920) of Chapter 6 of this part, including adults attending special classes for adults designed to serve the educational needs of handicapped adults operated pursuant to Section 52570, and teachers or other employees employed by
 the county superintendent of schools, to and from school athletic contests or other school activities, or to and from fairs or expositions held in the state or in any adjoining state and in which the pupils participate actively or as spectators. The transportation may be provided on any day or days throughout the school year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 303, Sec. 1.   (SB 509)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1270.1.

The county superintendent of schools may allow pupils entitled to attend the public schools under his jurisdiction, but in attendance at a school other than a public school under the provisions of Section 48222, transportation upon the same terms and in the same manner and over the same routes of travel as is permitted pupils attending the public schools.

The authorization of this section shall be restricted to actual transportation when furnished by the county superintendent, and nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize or permit in lieu of transportation payments of money to parents or guardians of children attending
 private schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 347.)
-------------------------------------------

1271.

The county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, hold one trustees’ meeting in each year as follows:

(a) One school trustee of each school district of the county shall attend the meeting and participate in its proceedings but more than one trustee of any district may attend if the board of trustees of that district so directs.

(b) School trustees of each school district shall select the trustee or trustees who shall attend the meeting.

(c) Each trustee selected to attend the meeting shall be allowed his or her actual traveling expenses for not to exceed one day incurred in going to and returning from the meeting. The expenses shall be verified by the county superintendent of schools.

(d) The county superintendent shall notify each trustee of the county at least 10 days prior to calling of the trustees’ meeting of the time and place of the meeting.

(e) Each session of the trustees’ meeting may be called at any hour on the day specified and may continue for that time as those meeting see fit.

(f) The county superintendent shall draw his or her requisition on the county auditor who shall draw his or her warrant on the county school service fund to pay the expenses of holding the trustees’
 meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 21.   Operative January 1, 1992, by Sec. 709 of Ch. 1372.)
-------------------------------------------

1273.

The county superintendent of schools, in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the county board of education, may provide for the reimbursement of any person or persons for the theft, destruction, or damage by arson, burglary or vandalism of personal property brought in to be used in the facilities of the county superintendent of schools. Reimbursement shall be made only when prior approval for the use of the facilities was given, and after the value of the damaged or stolen property is agreed upon by the persons or person bringing in the property and the administrator or representative of the administrator. This determination of value need take place only after the
 theft, destruction, or damage of the property. The county superintendent of schools may establish a maximum value of reimbursement which will be paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 838.)
-------------------------------------------

1274.

The county superintendent of schools may establish a fund or funds for losses, and payments, including, but not limited to, property of the county superintendent of schools, any liability, and workers’ compensation, in the county treasury for the purpose of covering the deductible amount under deductible types of insurance policies, losses or payments arising from self-insurance programs, or losses or payments due to noninsured
 perils. In the fund or funds shall be placed such sums, to be provided in the budget of the county superintendent of schools, as will create an amount which, together with investments made from the fund or funds, will be sufficient in the judgment of the county superintendent of schools to protect the county superintendent of schools from those losses or to provide for payments on the deductible amount under deductible types of insurance policies, losses or payments arising from self-insurance programs, or losses or payments due to noninsured perils. Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting the county superintendent of schools from providing protection against those losses or liability for the payment of claims partly by means of the fund or funds and partly by means of insurance written by acceptable insurers.

The fund or funds shall be considered as separate and apart from all other funds of the county superintendent of schools, and the balance
 therein shall not be considered as being part of the working cash of the county superintendent of schools in compiling annual budgets.

Warrants may be drawn on, or transfers made from, the fund or funds so created only to reimburse or indemnify the county superintendent of schools for losses as herein specified, and for the payment of claims, administrative costs, related services, and to provide for deductible insurance amounts and purchase of excess insurance. The warrants or transfers shall be within the purpose of the fund or funds as established by the county superintendent of schools.

The cash placed in the fund or funds may be invested and reinvested by the county treasurer, with the advice and consent of the county superintendent of schools, in securities which are legal investments for surplus county funds in this state. The income derived from the investments, together with interest earned on uninvested funds,
 shall be considered revenue of and be deposited in the fund. The cost of contracts or services authorized by this section are appropriate charges against the respective fund.

The county superintendent of schools may contract for investigative, administrative, and claims adjustment services relating to claims. The contract may provide that the contracting firm may reject, settle, compromise, and approve claims against the county superintendent of schools, its officers or employees, within those limits and for those amounts as the county superintendent of schools may specify, and may provide that the contracting firm may execute and issue checks in payment of those claims, which checks shall be payable only from a trust account which may be established by the county superintendent of schools. Funds in the trust account established by the county superintendent of schools pursuant to the provisions of this section shall not exceed a sum sufficient as determined by the
 superintendent to provide for the settlement of claims for a 30-day period. The rejection or settlement and approval of a claim by the contracting firm in accordance with the terms of the contract shall have the same effect as would the rejection or settlement and approval of the claim by the county superintendent of schools. The contract may also provide that the contracting firm may employ legal counsel, subject to those terms and limitations as the county superintendent of schools may prescribe, to advise the contracting firm concerning the legality and advisability of rejecting, settling, compromising, and paying claims referred to the contracting firm by the county superintendent of schools for investigation and adjustment, or to represent the superintendent in litigation concerning the claims. The compensation and expenses of the attorney for services rendered to the county superintendent of schools shall be an appropriate charge against the appropriate fund.

The contract provided for in this section may contain any other terms and conditions the county superintendent of schools may consider necessary or desirable to effectuate the superintendent’s self-insured programs.

In lieu of, or in addition to, contracting for the services described in this section, the county superintendent of schools may authorize an employee or employees to perform any or all of the services and functions which the county superintendent of schools may contract for under the provisions of this section.

As used in this section, “firm” includes a person, corporation, or other legal entity.

A county superintendent of schools may participate in, or administer, insurance for one or more school or community college districts pursuant to this section, and Section 81602.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 89, Sec. 2.   (AB 2081)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1275.

The county superintendent may arrange with a county purchasing agent for the purchase of standard school supplies and equipment in accordance with the regulations of the county board of education and the purchasing agent shall act in that capacity when so authorized.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 40005 by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 312.)
-------------------------------------------

1276.

The county superintendent of schools may contract with an acceptable party who is one of the three lowest responsible bidders for the lease, purchase, or maintenance of electronic data-processing systems and for the lease, purchase, or maintenance of supporting software.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 288, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1277.

The county superintendent of schools, with the approval of the county board of education and in accordance with rules prescribed by the board, may market or license any noneducational mainframe electronic data-processing software developed by that office to any person or any public or private corporation or agency. Proceeds from the marketing or licensing of noneducational mainframe electronic data-processing software under this section shall be used exclusively for educational purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 607, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1278.

The superintendent of schools of each county may conduct teacher institutes on behalf of the school districts in the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

1279.

(a) The county superintendent of schools shall not in any manner dispose of any item of personal property worth over twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) that belongs to the county office of education without meeting the following conditions:

(1) Obtaining an independent valuation of the property.

(2) Advertising the property for sale in a newspaper of general circulation within the district, or, if there is no
 newspaper of general circulation within the district, in any newspaper of general circulation that is regularly circulated in the district. The advertisement shall be published for a period of time in accordance with the policy of the county board of education.

(3) Bringing the matter to the attention of the county board of education for its discussion at a regularly scheduled public meeting.

(4) Obtaining the approval of the county board of education.

(b) The county superintendent of schools shall not in any manner dispose of any personal property worth less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) that belongs to the county office of education unless he or she certifies the value of the property in a quarterly report and submits that report to the county board of education for its review.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 838, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1280.

If a revision in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) is proposed by the county superintendent of schools to the annual budget of the county superintendent of schools after the county board of education has adopted the budget, the revision shall be incorporated in the next interim financial report or other board report when the report is submitted to the county board of education for discussion and approval at a regularly scheduled public meeting of the county board of education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 838, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1281.

(a) No county superintendent of schools may hire as a consultant any entity in which he or she has a financial interest.

(b) If the county superintendent of schools enters into a consultant contract for twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or more and the contract constitutes a budget revision, it shall be incorporated in the next interim financial report or other board report when the report is submitted to the county board of education for discussion and approval at a regularly
 scheduled public meeting of the county board of education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 838, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Staff [1290. - 1302.]

1290.

Except as otherwise provided by law, every county superintendent may appoint a deputy.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1292.

The compensation of each deputy school superintendent of a city and county shall be not less than the minimum received by any high school principal in the city and county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1293.

A county superintendent of schools may enter into contracts of employment with persons employed by him in positions requiring certification qualifications for periods of not to exceed the end of the school year in which the term for which the county superintendent of schools was elected or appointed expires and in no event, for more than four years and six months.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1294.

Each person employed by a county superintendent of schools in a position requiring certification qualifications, except employees included in the civil service system or in any merit system, or any person who holds an office by virtue of an election conducted under the Elections Code or the Education Code, and whose salary is paid from the county school service fund, has the same right with respect to leaves of absence, sick leave, and bereavement leave as a person employed by a school district or a community college district in a position requiring certification qualifications.

Sections 22724, 44845, 44922, 44949, 44955, 44962 to 44976, inclusive, 44977, 44978, 44979, 44983, 44984, 44985, 44987, 87413, 87414, 87740, 87743, 87763 to 87779, inclusive, 87780, 87781, 87782, 87786, 87787, and 87788 apply to persons so employed by a county superintendent of schools and so paid from the county school service fund. Whenever, in those provisions, a duty or power is imposed upon or granted to the governing board of a school district or community college district or an employee thereof, the power or duty shall, for the purposes of this section, be deemed to be granted to or imposed on the county superintendent of schools or his or her employee, respectively. When “district” is used in those provisions, it shall, for the purposes of this section, be deemed to mean “county superintendent of schools.” Compensation paid to employees during those leaves shall be paid from the county school service fund.

The granting of leaves of absence to employees pursuant to Section 44966 or 87767 shall be by the county superintendent of schools, upon approval by the county board of education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

1294.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, a county superintendent of schools may employ substitute or temporary employees in a position requiring certification requirements to serve for periods of less than one year to provide instructional and related educational services in county community schools operated pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 1980) of Part 2 and juvenile court schools operated pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 48645) of Chapter 4 of Part 27 if a temporary increase in enrollment exists.

(b) The number of employees hired under this section shall not exceed the number necessary to accommodate the temporary increase in enrollment and shall not increase established class size or pupil-to-teacher ratios, or both.

(c) If a substitute or temporary employee serves more than 60 schooldays, the employee is deemed to have been hired as a substitute or temporary employee for the duration of the semester in which the employee renders the substitute or temporary service.

(d) Notwithstanding Sections 44917 and 44920, it is not required that substitute or temporary employees employed under this section replace regularly employed persons absent from service.

(e) For purposes of this section, a temporary increase in enrollment exists when the number of pupils enrolled is more than the average enrollment of the preceding two fiscal years prior to the year in which the substitute or temporary employee was hired under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 255, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1294.5.

Any county superintendent of schools may employ persons possessing an appropriate credential as certificated employees in programs and projects to perform services conducted under contract with public or private agencies, or other categorically funded projects of indeterminate duration. The terms and conditions under which such persons are employed shall be mutually agreed upon by the employee and the county superintendent and such agreement shall be reduced to writing. Service pursuant to this section shall not be included in computing the service required as a prerequisite to attainment of, or eligibility to, classification as a permanent employee unless (1) such person has served pursuant to this section for at least 75 percent of the number of days the regular schools of county superintendent by which he is employed are maintained, and (2) such person is subsequently employed as a probationary employee in a position requiring certification qualifications. Such persons may be employed for periods which are less than a full school year and may be terminated at the expiration of the contract or specially funded project without regard to other requirements of this code respecting the termination of probationary or permanent employees.

This section shall not be construed to apply to any regularly credentialed employee who has been employed in the regular educational programs of the county superintendent of schools as a probationary employee before being subsequently assigned to any one of these programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

1295.

The county superintendent of schools, with the approval of the county board of education, may grant leaves of absence, with or without pay, to persons employed by him in positions not requiring certification qualifications in the same manner and to the same extent as is permitted of school district governing boards by Section 45190 and Section 88190.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1296.

(a) If the average daily attendance of the schools and classes maintained by a county superintendent of schools is 250 or more, each person who, after being employed for three complete consecutive school years by the superintendent in a teaching position in those schools or classes requiring certification qualifications and whose salary is paid from the county school service fund, is reelected for the next succeeding school year to such a position in those schools or classes, shall be classified as and become a permanent employee of the county superintendent of schools.

Such an employee shall have the same rights and duties as employees of school districts to which Section 44882 applies. Sections 44841, 44842, 44882, 44948.3, and 44948.5 are applicable to these employees.

This subdivision shall apply only to probationary employees whose probationary period commenced prior to the 1983–84 fiscal year.

(b) If the average daily attendance of the schools and classes maintained by a county superintendent of schools is 250 or more, each person who, after being employed for two complete consecutive school years by the superintendent in a teaching position in those schools or classes requiring certification qualifications and whose salary is paid from the county school service fund, is reelected for the next succeeding school year to such a position in those schools or classes, shall be classified as and become a permanent employee of the county superintendent of schools.

The county superintendent of schools shall notify the employee, on or before March 15 of the employee’s second complete consecutive year of employment by the superintendent in a teaching position in schools or classes maintained by the superintendent requiring certification qualifications, of the decision to reelect or not reelect the employee for the next succeeding school year to such a position in those schools. In the event that the county superintendent does not give notice pursuant to this section on or before March 15, the employee shall be deemed reelected for the next succeeding school year.

Such an employee shall have the same rights and duties as employees of school districts to which Section 44882 applies. Sections 44841, 44842, 44882, 44948.3, and 44948.5 are applicable to these employees.

This subdivision shall apply only to probationary employees whose probationary period commenced during the 1983–84 fiscal year or any fiscal year thereafter. 

(c) As used in this section, “teaching position” means any certificated position designated as of January 1, 1983, by the county board of education or the county superintendent of schools as a teaching position for the purpose of granting probationary or permanent status.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1115, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.

For the purpose of insurance under the workers’ compensation laws of this state, any person employed by a county superintendent of schools to supervise instruction or to give instruction in the school districts or community college districts located in the territory under the jurisdiction of the county superintendent of schools shall be deemed an employee of the county. The cost of insuring any person employed to supervise instruction shall be paid by the county superintendent of schools from the county school service fund. The cost of insuring any person employed by the county superintendent of schools to give instruction shall be paid by the county superintendent of schools from the county school service fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

1298.

By agreement between the county board of education and county board of supervisors, in counties in which the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 1310) have become operative and in which functions and duties have been transferred from the county board of supervisors to the county board of education in accordance with Sections 1043 and 1080, the county superintendent of schools may be authorized to employ an administrative adviser as part of the classified service. His or her compensation shall be as fixed by the county board of education, and shall be paid from that part of the single budget prepared by the county board of education for which a county tax is levied pursuant to Section 1623. His or her duties shall be the administrative duties established by the county board of education, and to counsel with and act as a coordinator between, the district attorney or county counsel, the county board of education, the county committee on school district organization, the personnel commission, the county superintendent of schools, school districts, and community college districts which request his or her services. The district attorney or county counsel shall continue to have and to discharge all of the authority and duties imposed upon him or her by law in the schools and education fields; however, the administrative adviser may be deputized by the district attorney or county counsel, in his or her discretion, if the adviser is admitted to practice law in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

1299.

A supervisor of health employed by the county superintendent of schools shall perform such duties in connection with the supervision of the health of pupils as are prescribed by the county superintendent of schools.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1300.

(a) A county superintendent of schools may award consultancy contracts to retired certificated employees of the county superintendent of schools or a school district or community college district of the county who were employed by the county superintendent of schools or a school district or community college district of the county for at least 10 years and who are at least 55 years of age.

(b) A county superintendent of schools may enter into a contract with a retired certificated employee who has been employed by the county superintendent of schools or a school district or community college district of the county at least 10 years and who is at least 55 years of age whereby the retired employee is granted a consultancy contract with the county superintendent of schools, which contract is renewable on an annual basis for up to five years or until the retired employee reaches age 65, whichever comes first.

(c) Persons hired by a consultancy contract as authorized by this section are considered employees and are subject to the earnings limitation provided in Section 23919.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 355.)
-------------------------------------------

1301.

The county superintendent of schools, in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the county board of education, may provide for the payment of the costs of replacing or repairing property of an employee, such as eyeglasses, hearing aids, dentures, watches, articles of clothing necessarily worn or carried by the employee, or vehicles when any such property is damaged in the line of duty without fault of the employee or if such property is stolen from the employee by robbery or theft while the employee is in the line of duty. If the property is damaged beyond repair or stolen, the actual value of such property may be paid. The determination of the value of such property shall be equal to its value at the time of the damage, destruction, or theft. Limits may be established for the payment for such damaged or stolen property.

In the event the employee is paid the costs of replacing or repairing such property, or the actual value of such property, the county superintendent of schools shall, to the extent of such payments, be subrogated to any right of the employee to recover compensation for such damaged or stolen property. The county superintendent of schools may file and prosecute an action to enforce its subrogation right in the small claims court if the amount of the claim is within that court’s monetary jurisdiction or may enforce its subrogation right in any other court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 838.)
-------------------------------------------

1302.

(a) The county superintendent of schools shall not increase by ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more the salary or bonus of any employee of the county office of education unless the matter is brought to the attention of the county board of education for its discussion at a regularly scheduled public meeting of the county board of education.

(b) The county superintendent of schools shall not increase the retirement benefits of any employee of the county office of education unless the matter is brought to the attention of the county board of education for its discussion at a regularly scheduled public meeting of the county board of education and the county board of education approves the increase.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 838, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Classified County School Employees [1310. - 1319.]

1310.

The provisions of this article shall become operative in any county upon adoption of a resolution by the county board of supervisors to make it operative.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1311.

Each person employed by a county superintendent of schools in a position not requiring certification qualifications and whose salary is paid from the county school service fund shall be employed in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 44000) and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 45100) of Part 25 of Division 3 of Title 2, and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 87000) and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 88000) of Part 51 of Division 7 of Title 3.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1312.

County employees assigned to the office of the county superintendent of schools shall cease to be employees of the county upon the establishment of a separate budget for the office of the county superintendent of schools, and shall thereafter be paid from the county school service fund. Other county employees assigned to functions transferred to the county board of education pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 1080) of Chapter 1 of this part shall cease to be employees of the county upon the effective date of such transfer, and shall thereafter be paid from the county school service fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1313.

Each county employee whose status is changed by this article, and who is in employment and a member of a county retirement system other than one provided by contract with the Public Employees’ Retirement System on the date of the change, shall become eligible for membership in the Public Employees’ Retirement System in accordance with the Public Employees’ Retirement Law with respect to his or her employment thereafter, and shall be subject to the reciprocal benefits provided by those systems. However, the employee may elect to continue in membership of the county retirement system with respect to his or her employment thereafter, in which event the same appropriations and transfers of funds shall be made to the retirement fund of the county system for the employee as those required of the county under the county retirement law, and these amounts shall
 be legal charges against the county school service fund. The election authorized by this section shall be made no later than the date preceding the date upon which his or her status is changed in accordance with procedures to be established by the county board of supervisors, which shall allow at least 30 days to make the election. The election once made shall not be rescinded. An employee who does not elect to continue membership in the county system shall be deemed to have discontinued county employment for purposes of the county system at the close of the day preceding the date upon which his or her status changes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 53.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1314.

County employees whose status is changed by this article shall retain all accumulated and unused sick leave, vacation, compensatory overtime and other benefits which can reasonably be construed to have been an earned right at the time of transfer from county service to the county school service fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1315.

The county board of education may grant to employees whose salaries are paid from the county school service fund any employee benefit which the board of supervisors provides for county employees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1316.

No employee transferred from the county service to a position, the salary for which is paid from the county school service fund, shall suffer any loss of salary at the time of transfer or as to the future as relates to his status on the salary scale of the county in effect at the time of the transfer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1317.
